Washington statutes.
RCW 39.90.060

Validation of debts, contracts and obligations regardless of interest rates.

All debts, contracts and obligations heretofore made or incurred by or in favor of the state, state agencies, The Evergreen State College, community colleges, and regional and state universities, and the political subdivisions, municipal corporations and quasi municipal corporations of this state, are hereby declared to be legal and valid and of full force and effect from the date thereof, regardless of the interest rate borne by any such debts, contracts and obligations.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 93; 1970 ex.s. c 66 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.